src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! ==========================================================================
!!               !!!North Saami noun declension
! ==========================================================================





!! !!Bisyllabic nouns
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON IIVA !!= * __@CODE@__ -iivva loan words. 
            :ij'va  GOAHTI     ;
 +N+Err/Orth:ijva%> GOAHTI-OBL ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-A !!= * __@CODE@__ divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
   GOAHTI ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-I  !!= * __@CODE@__ divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
                GOAHTI-IU     ;
 +N+Err/Orth:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-U  !!= * __@CODE@__ divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
                GOAHTI-IU     ;
 +N+Err/Orth:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;



LEXICON GOAHTI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
                           +N:%>              GOAHTICMP       ;
                    +N+Sg+Nom:                K               ;
< "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá         K               ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi         K               ;
                           +N:%>              EssV            ;
                           +N:%>              GOAHTI-OBL      ;
                           +N:                DenominalAdjsV1 ;
                           +N:                DenominalAdjsV2 ;
                           +N:                DenominalNounsV ;
 
LEXICON PROFIILA !!= * __@CODE@__  -iila Loan words.
                            +N:j'la%>  GOAHTICMP       ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:l%>     GOAHTICMP       ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:j'la    K               ;
            +N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:la      K               ;
! +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K               ;
! +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K               ;
                            +N:j'la%>  EssV            ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:la%>    EssV            ;
                            +N:j'la%>  GOAHTI-OBL      ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:la%>    GOAHTI-OBL      ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:ila%>   GOAHTI-OBL      ;
!                           +N:        DenominalAdjsV1 ;
!                           +N:        DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!                           +N:        DenominalNounsV ;
 
 
 
LEXICON VARRA !!= * __@CODE@__  varra and uvdna. No -laš, to get rid of varalaš and uvnnalaš from speller
                           +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP       ;
                    +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K               ;
                       < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K               ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K               ;
                           +N:%>                                     EssV            ;
                           +N:%>                                     GOAHTI-OBL      ;
                           +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1 ;
                  +N+Err/Orth:                                       DenominalAdjsV2 ;
                           +N:                                       DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON AKCU !!= * __@CODE@__  Only 'ákču': No -heapme, no wg+Foc/han (thereby avoiding ávččuhit, ávččuhan, ávččuhat in speller) Short nom-compound-form ákčo-,long/short gen
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP       ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K               ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K               ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K               ;
                            +N:%>                                     EssV            ;
!                           +N:%>                                     GOAHTI-OBL      ; replaced by individual pointers:
                            +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-         ;
                            +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI         ; ! Ill sublexicon
!                           +N:%>X4                                   GOADI-          ; ! weak grade decl, replaced by individual pointers
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K_not_ge        ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K_not_ge        ;
           +N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:%>X4                                   R               ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V           ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V           ;
                     +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s                                  K               ;
      +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n                                  K               ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%>                               NPxC            ;
                     +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K               ;
            +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k                                  K               ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-          ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-          ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-          ; ! AG Px
!                           +N:%>X8                                   GOADE-          ; ! Ditto (?)
                   +N+Err/Orth:                                       DenominalAdjsV1 ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:                                       DenominalAdjsV2 ;
                            +N:                                       DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-IU !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
                               +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP       ;
                        +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K               ;
                           < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
     +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K               ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX+Adv:»X7viđi                                K               ;
                               +N:%>                                     EssV            ;
                               +N:%>                                     GOAHTI-IU-OBL   ;
                               +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1 ;
                               +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2 ;
                               +N:                                       DenominalNounsV ;
