src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
ageanta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:agean'ta GOAHTI-A "agent N" ;
badjelfápmu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:badjel#fápmu GOAHTI-U ;
bahtošdolgi:bahtoš#dol'gi GOAHTI-I ;
barganmiella+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen:bargan#miella GOAHTI-A ;
bargiidsuodjalanbiire+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bargiid9#suodjalan#bij're GOAHTI ;
bievlamáđidja+Route:bievla#máđid'ja GOAHTI-A ;
kvenavarra:kvena#varra VARRA ;
birasláđđi+Txt:biras#láđđi GOAHTI-I ;
birasmirku:biras#mir'ku GOAHTI-U ;
liseansagurse:liseansa#gur'se GOAHTI ;
bohccovarra:bohcco#varra VARRA ;
riškkuhanvarra:riškkuhan#varra VARRA ;
bohrra:bohrra GOAHTI-A ;
buohccidivššársearvi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org+Use/-Spell:buohcci#divššár#sear'vi GOAHTI-I ;
byrå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:byrå GOAHTI ;
vuodjinleahttu:vuodjin#leahttu GOAHTI-U ;
bákša:bák'ša GOAHTI-A ;
diehtogirji+Txt:diehto#gir'ji GOAHTI-I ;
diggegiella+Lang:digge#giella GOAHTI-A ;
divavuođđu:diva#vuođđu GOAHTI-U ;
doavttirgráhtagurse+Use/-Spell:doavttir#gráhta#gur'se GOAHTI ;
duodjeruhta+Money:duodje#ruh'ta GOAHTI-A ;
duopmársuorgi:duopmár#suor'gi GOAHTI-I ;
dánsumeannu:dánsu#meannu GOAHTI-U ;
dáččagielda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:dáčča#giel'da GOAHTI-A ;
eamiálbmotmiellahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eami#álbmot#miel#lahttu GOAHTI ;
eananháldi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eanan#háldi¤ GOAHTI-I ;
elliidčálgoláhka:elliid9#čálgo#láh'ka GOAHTI-A ;
lávggodanláddu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:lávggodan#láddu GOAHTI-U ;
friddjamearka+Use/Sub:fri#mear'ka GOAHTI-A ;
fuođđobire+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:fuođđo#bire GOAHTI ;
fáddábeaivi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time:fáddá#beaj'vi GOAHTI-I ;
geasseláhttu+Route:geasse#láhttu GOAHTI-U ;
geađgeuvdna:geađge#uvdna VARRA ;
gielddarádji:gieldda#rád'ji GOAHTI-I ;
gielddastivrralahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gieldda#stivrra#lahttu GOAHTI ;
girkokonsearta+Event:girko#konsear'ta GOAHTI-A ;
goanstavarra:goansta#varra VARRA ;
gumpposvarra:gumppos#varra VARRA ;
golleruvdnu+Money:golle#ruvdno GOAHTI ;
gollu+Money:gollu GOAHTI-U ;
gudji:gud'ji GOAHTI-I ;
heage:heage GOAHTI ;
horti+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Ani:hor'ti GOAHTI-I ;
idjastállu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:idja#stállu GOAHTI-U ;
iešjeŋgenskruvva:ieš#jeŋgen#skruv'va GOAHTI-A ;
jiekŋaskábe:jiekŋa#skábe GOAHTI ;
jápmavarra:jápma#varra VARRA ;
kefirbipmi:kefir#bipmi GOAHTI-I ;
koanstavarra:koansta#varra VARRA ;
goarralahttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:goarra#lahttu GOAHTI ;
kulttorplána:kulttor#plána GOAHTI-A ;
latnjasárgu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:latnja#sár'gu GOAHTI-U ;
luohkkáceahkki:luohkká#ceahkki GOAHTI-I ;
luossareive:luossa#rej've GOAHTI ;
lohkanspeallu:lohkan#speallu GOAHTI-U ;
maŋŋelasta:maŋŋe#las'ta GOAHTI-A ;
mirkko:mirkko GOAHTI ;
maninguovdnji:manin#guovdnji GOAHTI-I ;
nammasiidu:namma#sij'du GOAHTI-U ;
noaidegievdni:noaide#gievdni GOAHTI-I ;
oaffarvarra:oaffar#varra VARRA ;
návstouksa:návsto#uk'sa GOAHTI-A ;
lohkkireive:lohkki#rej've GOAHTI ;
oktiibidju:oktii#bid'ju GOAHTI-U ;
ođjorissi+G3:ođjo#ris'si GOAHTI-I ;
reaibma:reaibma GOAHTI-A ;
rohkajáffogáfe:rohka#jáffo#gáfe GOAHTI ;
rohtohilsku+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Plant:rohto#hilsku¤ GOAHTI-U ;
reportášaášši+G3:reportáša#áš'ši GOAHTI-I ;
rávesolbmuidoahppogurse:ráves#olbmuid9#oahppo#gur'se GOAHTI ;
sierranahttinseaŋgalatnja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:sierranahttin#seaŋga#latnja GOAHTI-A ;
skirri+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Ani:skir'ri GOAHTI-I ;
skuvlašaddu:skuvla#šaddu GOAHTI-U ;
spánnja+Use/Sub:spán'njá GOAHTI ;
suodjalussuorgi:suodjalus#suor'gi GOAHTI-I ;
sámekonferánsa+v2+Event:sáme#konferean'sa GOAHTI-A ;
sámevearru+Money:sáme#vearru GOAHTI-U ;
treddjo+Clth:treddjo GOAHTI ;
uvdna:uvdna VARRA ;
varra:varra VARRA ;
vuojadantiibmu:vuojadan#tijbmu GOAHTI-U ;
váldogeologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:váldo#geologa GOAHTI-A ;
áibbasguorosluovdi:áibbas#guoros#luov'di GOAHTI-I ;
čalmmegeaidu:čalmme#geaj'du GOAHTI-U ;
čuvgesvarra:čuvges#varra VARRA ;
čáhppesvarra:čáhppes#varra VARRA ;
govvidangurse:govvidan#gur'se GOAHTI ;
stáhtakapitalista+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:stáhta#kapitalis'ta GOAHTI-A ; !^LOAN
njuolggocáhcu:njuolggo#cáh'cu GOAHTI-U ;
